Utah statutes.
13-35-105.   Registration -- Fees.
(1)  A franchisee or franchisor doing business in this state shall:
(a)  annually register or renew its registration with the department in a
manner established by the department; and
(b)  pay an annual registration fee in an amount determined by the department
in accordance with Sections 13-1-2 and 63J-1-504.
(2)  The department shall register or renew the registration of a franchisee
or franchisor if the franchisee or franchisor complies with this chapter and
rules made by the department under this chapter.
(3)  A franchisee or franchisor registered under this section shall comply
with this chapter and any rules made by the department under this chapter
including any amendments to this chapter or the rules made after a franchisee
or franchisor enter into a franchise agreement.
(4)  The fee imposed under Subsection (1)(b) shall be collected by the
department and deposited into the Commerce Service Fund.
(5)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an agent, officer, or field or area
representative of a franchisor does not need to be registered under this
section if the franchisor is registered under this section.
